Vermont statutes. Title 7 Alcoholic Beverages, Cannabis, and Tobacco
Subchapter 4. Tasting and Event Permits

§ 251.
Educational sampling event permit.

The Division of Liquor Control may grant an educational sampling event permit to a person if:

the event is also approved by the local control commissioners; and

at least 15 days prior to the event, the applicant submits an application to the Division in a form required by the Commissioner that includes a list of the alcoholic beverages to be acquired for sampling at the event and is accompanied by the fee provided in section 204 of this title.

An educational sampling event permit holder is permitted to conduct an event that is open to the public at which malt beverages, vinous beverages, fortified wines, spirits, or all four are served only for the purposes of marketing and educational sampling.

No more than four educational sampling event permits shall be issued annually to the same person.
(c) (1) No more than four educational sampling event permits shall be issued annually to the same person.

An educational sampling event permit shall be valid for no more than four consecutive days.

The permit holder shall ensure all the following:

Attendees at the educational sampling event shall be required to pay an entry fee of no less than $5.00.

Malt beverages or vinous beverages for sampling shall be offered in glasses that contain no more than two ounces of either beverage.
(2) (A) Malt beverages or vinous beverages for sampling shall be offered in glasses that contain no more than two ounces of either beverage.

Fortified wines and spirits for sampling shall be offered in glasses that contain no more than one-quarter ounce of either beverage.

The event shall be conducted in compliance with all the requirements of this title.

An educational sampling event permit holder:

may receive shipments directly from a manufacturer, packager, certificate of approval holder, wholesale dealer, or importer licensed in Vermont or that provides evidence of licensure in another state or foreign country satisfactory to the Board;

may transport alcoholic beverages to the event site, and those beverages may be served at the event by the permit holder or the holder’s employees, volunteers, or representatives of a manufacturer, packager, or importer participating in the event, provided they meet the server age and training requirements under section 259 of this chapter; and

shall mark all cases and bottles of alcoholic beverages to be served at the event “For sampling only. Not for resale.”

Taxes for the alcoholic beverages served at the event shall be paid as follows:

malt beverages:

$0.265 per gallon of malt beverages served that contain not more than six percent alcohol by volume at 60 degrees Fahrenheit; and

$0.55 per gallon of malt beverages served that contain more than six percent alcohol by volume at 60 degrees Fahrenheit;

vinous beverages: $0.55 per gallon served;

spirits: $19.80 per gallon served; and

fortified wines: $19.80 per gallon served.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. June 21, 2002;

2005, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 9, 2006;

2007, No. 10

, § 2, eff. April 26, 2007;

2015, No. 51

, § A.11, eff. Jan. 1, 2016;

2017, No. 83

, § 38;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 48;

2019, No. 14

, § 8, eff. April 30, 2019.

§ 252.
Special event permits.

The Division of Liquor Control may issue a special event permit if the application is submitted to the Division of Liquor Control with the fee provided in section 204 of this title at least five days prior to the date of the event.
(a) (1) The Division of Liquor Control may issue a special event permit if the application is submitted to the Division of Liquor Control with the fee provided in section 204 of this title at least five days prior to the date of the event.

A special event permit shall be valid for the duration of each public event or four days, whichever is shorter.

A special event permit holder may sell alcoholic beverages manufactured or rectified by the permit holder by the glass or the unopened bottle.
(b) (1) A special event permit holder may sell alcoholic beverages manufactured or rectified by the permit holder by the glass or the unopened bottle.

For purposes of tasting, a special event permit holder may distribute beverages manufactured or rectified by the permit holder with or without charge, provided the beverages are distributed:

by the glass; and

in quantities of no more than two ounces per product and eight ounces total of malt beverages or vinous beverages and no more than one ounce in total of spirits or fortified wines to each individual.

A licensed manufacturer or rectifier may be issued not more than 10 special event permits for the same physical location in a calendar year.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 49; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 49;

2019, No. 73

, § 47, eff. July 1, 2021.

§ 253.
Festival permits.

The Division of Liquor Control may grant a festival permit if the applicant has:

received approval from the local control commissioners;

submitted a request for a festival permit to the Division in a form required by the Commissioner at least 15 days prior to the festival; and

paid the fee provided in section 204 of this title.

A festival required to be permitted under this section is any event that is open to the public for which the primary purpose is to serve one or more of the following: malt beverages, vinous beverages, fortified wines, or spirits.

A festival permit holder is permitted to conduct an event that is open to the public at which one or more of the following are served: malt beverages, vinous beverages, fortified wines, or spirits.

The permit holder shall ensure the following:

Attendees at the festival shall be required to pay an entry fee of not less than $5.00.

Malt beverages for sampling shall be offered in glasses that contain not more than 12 ounces, with not more than 60 ounces served to any patron at one event.
(2) (A) Malt beverages for sampling shall be offered in glasses that contain not more than 12 ounces, with not more than 60 ounces served to any patron at one event.

Vinous beverages for sampling shall be offered in glasses that contain not more than five ounces with not more than 25 ounces served to any patron at one event.

Fortified wines for sampling shall be offered in glasses that contain not more than three ounces with not more than 15 ounces served to any patron at one event.

Spirits for sampling shall be offered in glasses that contain not more than one ounce with not more than five ounces served to any patron at one event.

Patrons attending a festival where combinations of malt, vinous, fortified wines, or spirits are mutually sampled shall not be served more than a combined total of six U.S. standard drinks containing 3.6 fluid ounces or 84 grams of pure ethyl alcohol.

The event shall be conducted in compliance with all the requirements of this title.

A festival permit holder may purchase invoiced volumes of malt or vinous beverages directly from a manufacturer or packager licensed in Vermont or a manufacturer or packager that holds a federal Basic Permit or Brewers Notice or evidence of licensure in a foreign country that is satisfactory to the Board.
(e) (1) A festival permit holder may purchase invoiced volumes of malt or vinous beverages directly from a manufacturer or packager licensed in Vermont or a manufacturer or packager that holds a federal Basic Permit or Brewers Notice or evidence of licensure in a foreign country that is satisfactory to the Board.

The invoiced volumes of malt or vinous beverages may be transported to the site and sold by the glass to the public by the permit holder or its employees and volunteers only during the event.

A festival permit holder shall be subject to the provisions of this title, including section 214 of this title, and the rules of the Board regarding the sale of the alcoholic beverages and shall pay the tax on the malt or vinous beverages pursuant to section 421 of this title.

A person shall be granted not more than four festival permits per year, and each permit shall be valid for not more than four consecutive days.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 50; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 50;

2021, No. 70

, § 3.

§ 254.
Special venue serving permits.

The Division of Liquor Control may grant an art gallery, bookstore, public library, or museum a special venue serving permit if the applicant has:

received approval from the local control commissioners;

submitted a request for a permit to the Division in a form required by the Commissioner at least five days prior to the event; and

paid the fee provided in section 204 of this title.

A permit holder may purchase malt or vinous beverages directly from a licensed retailer.

A permit holder shall be subject to the provisions of this title and the rules of the Board regarding the service of alcoholic beverages.

A public library or museum may only be granted a permit pursuant to this section for an event held for a charitable or educational purpose at which malt and vinous beverages will be served for a period of not more than six hours.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 51; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 51.

§ 255.
Retail alcoholic beverage tasting permits.

The Division of Liquor Control may grant a licensee a permit to conduct an alcoholic beverage tasting event as provided in subsection (b) of this section if:

the licensee has submitted a written application in a form required by the Commissioner and paid the fee provided in section 204 of this title at least five days prior to the date of the alcoholic beverage tasting event; and

the Commissioner determines that the licensee is in good standing.

The Division may grant the following alcoholic beverage tasting permits to the following types of licensees:

A second-class licensee.

The permit authorizes the employees of the second-class licensee or of a designated manufacturer or rectifier to dispense to each customer of legal age on the licensee’s premises malt or vinous beverages by the glass not to exceed two ounces of each beverage with a total of eight ounces of malt or vinous beverages.

Malt or vinous beverages dispensed at the tasting event shall be from the inventory of the licensee or purchased from a wholesale dealer.

A second-class licensee may be granted up to 48 tasting permits per year. In addition, a second-class licensee may be granted up to five permits per week to conduct a tasting as part of an educational food preparation class or course conducted by the licensee on the licensee’s premises.

A licensed manufacturer or rectifier of malt or vinous beverages.

The permit authorizes the licensed manufacturer or rectifier to dispense to each customer of legal age for consumption on the premises of a second-class licensee beverages produced by the manufacturer or rectifier by the glass not to exceed two ounces of each beverage with a total of eight ounces of malt or vinous beverages.

A manufacturer or rectifier may conduct no more than 48 tastings per year.

A licensed wholesale dealer. The permit authorizes a licensed wholesale dealer to dispense malt or vinous beverages for promotional purposes at the wholesale dealer’s premises without charge to invited employees of first-, second-, and third-class licensees, provided the invited employees are of legal age.

A vinous beverage or malt beverage tasting event held pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, not including an alcoholic beverage tasting conducted on the premises of the manufacturer or rectifier, shall comply with the following:

continue for no more than six hours, with no more than six beverages to be offered at a single event, and no more than two ounces of any single beverage and no more than a total of eight ounces of malt or vinous beverages to be dispensed to a customer;

serve no more than eight individuals at one time; and

be conducted totally within a designated area that extends no further than 10 feet from the point of service and that is marked by a clearly visible sign that states that no one under 21 years of age may participate in the tasting.

The holder of a permit issued under this section shall keep an accurate accounting of the beverages consumed at a tasting event and shall be responsible for complying with all applicable laws under this title.

The holder of a permit issued under this section that provides alcoholic beverages to a minor or permits an individual under 18 years of age to serve alcoholic beverages at a tasting event under this section shall be fined not less than $500.00 nor more than $2,000.00 or imprisoned not more than two years, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 52; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 52.

§ 256.
Promotional tastings for licensees.

At the request of a first- or second-class licensee, a holder of a manufacturer’s, rectifier’s, or wholesale dealer’s license may distribute without charge to the first- or second-class licensee’s management and staff, provided they are of legal age, two ounces per person of vinous or malt beverages for the purpose of promoting the beverage.
(a) (1) At the request of a first- or second-class licensee, a holder of a manufacturer’s, rectifier’s, or wholesale dealer’s license may distribute without charge to the first- or second-class licensee’s management and staff, provided they are of legal age, two ounces per person of vinous or malt beverages for the purpose of promoting the beverage.

At the request of a holder of a third-class license, a manufacturer or rectifier of spirits or fortified wines may distribute without charge to the third-class licensee’s management and staff, provided they are of legal age, one-quarter ounce of each beverage and not more than a total of one ounce to each individual for the purpose of promoting the beverage.

No permit is required for a tasting pursuant to this subsection.

At the request of a holder of a wholesale dealer’s license, a first-class licensee may dispense malt or vinous beverages for promotional purposes without charge to invited management and staff of first-, second-, or third-class licensees, provided they are of legal age.
(b) (1) At the request of a holder of a wholesale dealer’s license, a first-class licensee may dispense malt or vinous beverages for promotional purposes without charge to invited management and staff of first-, second-, or third-class licensees, provided they are of legal age.

The event shall be held on the premises of the first-class licensee.

The first-class licensee shall be responsible for complying with all applicable laws under this title.

No permit is required for a tasting pursuant to this subsection, but the wholesale dealer shall provide written notice of the event to the Division of Liquor Control at least 10 days prior to the date of the tasting.

Upon receipt of a first- or second-class application by the Division, a holder of a wholesale dealer’s license may dispense malt or vinous beverages for promotional purposes without charge to invited management and staff of the business that has applied for a first- or second-class license, provided they are of legal age.
(c) (1) Upon receipt of a first- or second-class application by the Division, a holder of a wholesale dealer’s license may dispense malt or vinous beverages for promotional purposes without charge to invited management and staff of the business that has applied for a first- or second-class license, provided they are of legal age.

The event shall be held on the premises of the first- or second-class applicant.

The first- or second-class applicant shall be responsible for complying with all applicable laws under this title.

No malt or vinous beverages shall be left behind at the conclusion of the tasting.

No permit is required under this subsection, but the wholesale dealer shall provide written notice of the event to the Division at least five days prior to the date of the tasting.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 53; amended

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 40;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 53;

2021, No. 70

, § 4.

§ 257.
Tastings for product quality assurance.

A licensed manufacturer or rectifier may distribute to its management and staff who are directly involved in the production of the licensee’s products, provided they are of legal age and at the licensed premises, samples of the licensee’s products for the purpose of assuring the quality of the products.

Each sample of malt beverages or vinous beverages shall be no larger than two ounces, and each sample of spirits or fortified wines shall be no larger than one-quarter ounce.

No permit is required for a tasting pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 54.

§ 258.
Promotional railroad tasting permit.

The Division of Liquor Control may grant to a person that operates a railroad a tasting permit that permits the holder to conduct tastings of alcoholic beverages in the dining car if the person files with the Division an application along with the fee provided in section 204 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 11, 2010;

2017, No. 83

, § 43;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 54.

§ 259.
Tasting events; age and training of servers.

No individual who is under 18 years of age or who has not received training as required by the Division may serve alcoholic beverages at a tasting event under this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 55; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 55.